src/noun-myv-morph.txt
! ============================= !
!  Noun morphological lexica !
! ============================= !
! ===== !
! Adjs  !
! ===== !

LEXICON Abe-Adj
+Der/Abe: shumbra-Adj ;

! 2012-04-03 These do not exist in present dictionary
!LEXICON Comp-Adj
!+Der/Comp: shumbra-Adj ;

LEXICON Gen-Adj ! The genitive is used as an attribute and predicate modifier
+Der/Gen: Clitic ;
+Der/Gen: kal-NomSg-Conjugation ; ! These need checking 2012-04-17
+Der/Gen: kal-NomPl-Conjugation ; ! These need checking 2012-04-17


LEXICON vejketj-Adj-PL
 vitj-Adj ;

LEXICON vitj-Adj
+A: Clitic ;
+A: kit-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+A+Pl:%>тЬ2 kit-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+A+Pl: kit-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;
+A+Pl:%>тЬ2 Clitic ;
+A+Der/MWN: kit-N ;

LEXICON erek-Adj
+A: Clitic ;
+A: lak-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+A+Pl:%>тЬ2 kit-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+A+Pl: lak-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;
+A+Pl:%>тЬ2 Clitic ;
+A+Der/MWN: lak-N ;

LEXICON od-Adj
+A: Clitic ;
+A: kal-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+A+Pl:%>тЬ2 kit-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+A+Pl: kal-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;
+A+Pl:%>тЬ2 Clitic ;
+A+Der/MWN: kal-N ;

LEXICON vanjks-Adj
+A: Clitic ;
+A: kal-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+A+Pl:%>тЬ2 kit-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+A+Pl: kal-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;
+A+Pl:%>тЬ2 Clitic ;
+A+Der/MWN: osh-N ;

LEXICON chevte-Adj
 nachko-Adj ;

LEXICON lembe-Adj
 nachko-Adj ;

LEXICON nachko-Adj
+A: Clitic ;
+A: pango-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+A+Pl:%>тЬ2 kit-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+A+Pl: pango-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;
+A+Pl:%>тЬ2 Clitic ;
+A+Der/MWN: pango-N ;

LEXICON shumbra-Adj
+A: Clitic ;
+A: kudo-NomSg-Conjugation ;
+A+Pl:%>тЬ2 kit-NomPl-Conjugation ;
+A+Pl: kudo-NomPl-Conjugation-only ;
+A+Pl:%>тЬ2 Clitic ;
+A+Der/MWN: kudo-N ;

LEXICON Adj-Interr
+Interr: nachko-Adj ;
+Rel: nachko-Adj ;

! ===== !
! Nouns !
! ===== !

LEXICON kal-N
+N: kal-N-Derivation ;
+N: kal-N-Def-Declension ;
+N: kal-Indef-Declension ;
+N: kal-N-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON kal-N-PL
+N:%> DefPl-Declension ;
+N: kal-Indef-Declension ;
+N: kal-N-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON lak-N
+N: lak-N-Derivation ;
+N: lak-N-Def-Declension ;
+N: lak-Indef-Declension ;

LEXICON kit-N
+N: kit-N-Derivation ;
+Use/Sub/Short:%>TLoss DefPl-Declension ;
+N: kit-N-Def-Declension ;
+N: kit-Indef-Declension ;
+N: kit-N-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON kit-N-PL
+Use/Sub/Short:%>TLoss DefPl-Declension ;
+N: kit-Indef-Declension ;
+N: kit-N-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON klass-N
+N: klass-N-Derivation ;
+N: osh-N-Def-Declension ;
+N: osh-Indef-Declension ;
+N: kit-N-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON osh-N
+N: osh-N-Derivation ;
+N: osh-N-Def-Declension ;
+N: osh-Indef-Declension ;
+N: kit-N-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON osh-N-PL
+N: osh-N-Derivation ;
+N:%> DefPl-Declension ;
+N: osh-Indef-Declension ;
+N: osh-N-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON ije-N
 pango-N ;

LEXICON teshte-N
 pango-N ;

LEXICON tinge-N
 pango-N ;

LEXICON tinge-N-PL
+N:%> DefPl-Declension ;
+N+VLoss:%>VLoss DefPl-Declension ;
+N: pango-Indef-Declension ;
+N: kudo-N-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON pango-N
+N: pango-N-Derivation ;
+N: pango-N-Def-Declension ;
+N: pango-Indef-Declension ;
+N: pango-N-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON DV-NTag
+V+Der/OmA: kudo-N ;

LEXICON kudo-N
+N: kudo-N-Derivation ;
+N: kudo-N-Def-Declension ;
+N: kudo-Indef-Declension ;
+N: kudo-N-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON kudo-N-PL
+N: kudo-N-Derivation ;
+N:%> DefPl-Declension ;
+N: kudo-Indef-Declension ;
+N: kudo-N-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;

LEXICON avidem-N
+N+Assoc-Coll: kudo-N-Poss-Declension-CX ;

! ===== !
! Proper nouns !
! ===== !

LEXICON kal-PROP
+Prop: kal-N-Derivation ;
+Prop: kal-N-Def-Declension ;
+Prop: kal-Indef-Declension ;
+Prop: kal-N-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON lak-PROP
+Prop: lak-N-Derivation ;
+Prop: lak-N-Def-Declension ;
+Prop: lak-Indef-Declension ;
+Prop: lak-N-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON kit-PROP
+Prop: kit-N-Derivation ;
+Use/Sub/Short:%>TLoss DefPl-Declension ;
+Prop: kit-N-Def-Declension ;
+Prop: kit-Indef-Declension ;
+Prop: kit-N-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON osh-PROP
+Prop: osh-N-Derivation ;
+Prop: osh-N-Def-Declension ;
+Prop: osh-Indef-Declension ;
+Prop: osh-N-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON teshte-PROP
 pango-N ;

LEXICON tinge-PROP
 pango-N ;

LEXICON pango-PROP
+Prop: pango-N-Derivation ;
+Prop: pango-N-Def-Declension ;
+Prop: pango-Indef-Declension ;
+Prop: pango-N-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON kudo-PROP
+Prop: kudo-N-Derivation ;
+Prop: kudo-N-Def-Declension ;
+Prop: kudo-Indef-Declension ;
+Prop: kudo-N-Poss-Declension-CX ;

LEXICON kudo-PROP-PL
+Prop:%> DefPl-Declension ;
+Prop: kudo-Indef-Declension ;
+Prop: kudo-N-Poss-Declension-CX-PL ;


! ========== !
! Derivation !
! ========== !

LEXICON lak-N-Derivation
 kal-N-Derivation ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Tra+Sg+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>KLossкссе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Tra+Pl+Indef+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>KLossкссе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Tra+Sg+Indef+LV+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>KLossкс%>О1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Tra+Pl+Indef+LV+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>KLossкс%>О1се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;


LEXICON kit-N-Derivation
 kal-N-Derivation;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pl+Def+Ela+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>стэ kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pl+Def+Ine+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>сэ kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pl+Def+Prl+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>Г2а kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pl+Def+Comp+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>шка kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pl+Def+Abe+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>втеме kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pl+Def+Tra+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>кс osh-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pl+Def+Gen+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>ньсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pl+Def+Ela+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>стэсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pl+Def+Ine+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>сэсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pl+Def+Prl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>Г2асе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pl+Def+Comp+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>шкасе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pl+Def+Abe+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>втемесе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pl+Def+Tra+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>кссе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Use/Sub/Short+Pl+Def+Tra+LV+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N:%>TLossтне%>ксэсе kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
